Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7916.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 32-1 of the General Laws entitled "General Provisions" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
32-1-23. Taking of mushrooms from state parks, recreational areas, and forests
permitted.
(a) The director of the department of environmental management ("director") shall
promulgate, adopt, and enforce any and all rules and regulations deemed necessary to authorize
any person to take mushrooms from any lands under the control of the director, provided such
taking is for personal use only. The state shall have no liability to any person or the heirs or assigns
of any such person who engages in the taking of mushrooms from any lands under the control of
the director.
(b) Pursuant to the rules and regulations promulgated in accordance with the provisions of
subsection (a) of this section, any person lawfully using or present on the premises of any state
park, recreational area, forest or public land under the control or management of the director, may
collect and harvest wild mushrooms found growing thereon for personal use.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005745
========